Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-820
Joint entity; publication of resolution or other proceeding.

The governing body of the joint entity may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding adopted by it pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act in a newspaper of general circulation published in the political subdivision or county where the principal office or place of business of the joint agency is located or, if no newspaper is so published, in a newspaper qualified to carry legal notices having general circulation in the political subdivision or county.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 20.